District of Columbia statutes.
32-513

Effect on existing employment benefits.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall diminish an employer’s obligation to comply with any collective bargaining agreement or any employment benefit program or plan that provides greater family or medical leave rights to an employee than the family or medical leave rights provided under this chapter.

(b)

The rights provided to an employee under this chapter may not be diminished by any collective bargaining agreement or any employment benefit program or plan, except that this chapter shall not supersede any clause on family or medical leave in any collective bargaining agreement in force on October 3, 1990, for the time that the collective bargaining agreement is in effect.

(c)

The rights provided to an employee under this chapter may be suspended temporarily for an employee of a public safety agency if the employee is required by rules or regulations of the agency or by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement to return to duty because of an emergency declared by the agency head or the Mayor.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 14, 37 DCR 5043
1981 Ed., § 36-1313.